Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1062.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 902 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 902. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Veteran-related illness." A physical or mental health condition connected to an individual's service in the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component or National Guard. The term shall include suicide, post-traumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain injury and military sexual trauma.Section 2. Section 910 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 910. Continuing medical education.* * *(b.1) Veteran-related illness.--A physician licensed or certified to be registered with the licensure board shall complete three hours of training in the treatment of veteran-related illnesses as a condition of renewal under this subsection.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 911. Standards for initial licensure.(a) Veteran-related illness.--In order to obtain a license to practice medicine and surgery in this Commonwealth, an individual must satisfy curricula and training requirements regarding veteran-related illness as established by each licensure board.(b) Rules and regulations.--Each licensure board shall promulgate and enforce regulations consistent with the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, 20250SB1062PN1343 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, to establish requirements of initial licensure in accordance with subsection (a) for individuals who intend to practice medicine and surgery. The regulations shall include any fees necessary for the licensure board to carry out its responsibilities under this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1062PN1343 - 3 - 1234567